Wyoming, session 2025, HB0230.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-420 is created to read:

HB0230

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0192
9-1-420. Legislative stabilization reserve account
highway construction loans; maximum amount; repayment.

(a) With the approval of the state loan and
investment board, the state treasurer shall be authorized
to invest not more than two hundred fifty million dollars
($250,000,000.00) from the permanent Wyoming mineral trust
fund to provide loans to the department of transportation
for purposes of funding the construction of one (1) or more
highways approved by the transportation commission. The
authority to invest funds under this subsection shall
remain in effect until June 30, 2029.

(b) The interest rates on the loans authorized under
subsection (a) of this section shall be at a fixed interest
rate determined by the state treasurer to be reasonably
commensurate with the rates of return of the asset class
for which the monies would be otherwise invested. The
amounts invested in loans under subsection (a) of this
section shall be repaid as provided by subsection (e) of
this section.

HB0230

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0192
(c) Amounts invested in loans under subsection (a) of
this section shall be public purpose investments under W.S.
9-4-715(n).

(d) In addition to the amounts invested in loans
specified in subsection (a) of this section, the
transportation commission shall direct any available
federal highway safety funds to the construction of one (1)
or more highways approved by the transportation commission.

(e) Beginning on June 30, 2026 and June 30 of each
fiscal year thereafter until the amounts invested in loans
under this section are repaid, the state auditor shall
transfer fifty million dollars ($50,000,000.00) or as much
thereof as is available and required to repay the
outstanding amounts invested in loans this section, plus
any interest as determined by the state treasurer under
subsection (b) of this section and certified to the state
auditor, from the legislative stabilization reserve account
to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund for purposes of
repaying the amounts invested in loans under this section.
The state treasurer shall cease transferring funds to the
permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund when the amounts due
HB0230

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0192
under this section are repaid. The transfer under this
subsection may be in an amount less than fifty million
dollars ($50,000,000.00).

Section 2. W.S. 9-4-719(b)(intro) and (i) is amended
to read:

9-4-719. Investment earnings; spending policy;
permanent funds.

(b) There is created the permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund reserve account. All funds within the account
shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized
under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d), (e) and (r) and all investment
earnings from the account shall be credited to the account.
Except for funds specified by the legislature that
guarantee the obligations of permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund investment earnings and funds to be transferred
into the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, funds
deposited into the reserve account created by this
subsection are intended to be inviolate and constitute a
permanent or perpetual trust fund. Beginning July 1, 2021
for fiscal year 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, to
HB0230

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0192
the extent funds are available, the state treasurer shall
transfer unobligated funds from this account to the general
fund on a quarterly, pro-rata basis as necessary to ensure
that an amount equal to two and one-half percent (2.5%) of
the previous five (5) year average market value of the
permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, calculated on the
first day of the fiscal year, is available for expenditure
during each fiscal year. As soon as possible after the end
of each of the fiscal years beginning on and after July 1,
2017, after making any transfer required pursuant to
paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection, revenues in
this account in excess of two hundred forty-five percent
(245%) of the spending policy amount in subsection (d) of
this section shall be credited to the permanent Wyoming
mineral trust fund. For fiscal year 2020 2025 and for each
fiscal year thereafter:

(i) As soon as practicable after the end of the
fiscal year, after making any other transfers provided by
law from the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund reserve
account, but prior to calculating the balance of the
account under this subsection, the state treasurer shall
transfer from the account:
HB0230

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0192

(A) An amount equal to the difference
between the maximum amount which may be credited to the
strategic investments and projects account pursuant to
subsection (q) of this section and the amount actually
credited to that account in the applicable fiscal year;

(B) An amount equal to the difference
between the maximum amount that may be credited to the
legislative stabilization reserve account under subsection
(q) of this section and the amount actually credited to
that account in the applicable fiscal year.

Section 3.

(a) Upon approval by the transportation commission,
the planning, design and construction of the following
projects shall be authorized for the funds made available
under W.S. 9-1-420:

(i) The creation of passing lanes, where
appropriate, on the portion of United States highway 20
between Casper, Wyoming and Waltman, Wyoming;
HB0230

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0192

(ii) The creation of passing lanes, where
appropriate, on the portion of United States highway 20
between Waltman, Wyoming and Shoshoni, Wyoming;

(iii) The creation of passing lanes, where
appropriate, on the portion of the United States highway 20
between Shoshoni, Wyoming and Thermopolis, Wyoming;

(iv) The portion of United States highway 287
between Laramie, Wyoming and the Colorado state line that
consists of only two (2) lanes in order to make that
portion of the highway four (4) lanes;

(v) The portion of Wyoming Highway 59 between
Wright, Wyoming and Gillette, Wyoming to make that portion
of the highway five (5) lanes;

(vi) An alternative paved highway from Rock
Springs to Green River on the north side of Interstate 80.

Section 4.

HB0230

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0192
(a) There is created the interstate highways traffic
study task force to consist of the following members:

(i) Members of the legislature as follows:

(A) Three (3) members of the Wyoming house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house.
The speaker of the house shall designate one (1) of the
members appointed under this subparagraph to be co-chairman
of the task force;

(B) Three (3) members of the Wyoming
senate, appointed by the president of the senate. The
president of the senate shall designate one (1) of the
members appointed under this subparagraph to be co-chairman
of the task force.

(ii) Members of the Wyoming state government, as
follows:

(A) The governor or his designee;

HB0230

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0192
(B) The director of the department of
transportation or the director's designee;

(C) The director of the department of
tourism or the director's designee.

(iii) Members of the public appointed by the
governor, as follows:

(A) A member representing the trucking
industry;

(B) A member representing Wyoming local
governments;

(C) A member representing the mining
industry;

(D) A member representing the agriculture
industry;

(E) A member representing the construction
industry;
HB0230

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0192

(F) A member representing the railroad
industry.

(b) The task force shall:

(i) Study traffic and conditions on Wyoming's
interstate highways, focusing specifically on Interstate
80;

(ii) Study and consider methods for reducing
traffic and highway deterioration on Wyoming's interstate
highways, focusing specifically on Interstate 80,
including:

(A) A method that uses the railroad to
transport commercial motor vehicles across areas served by
interstate highways and requires commercial motor vehicles
to pay a fee for the transportation;

(B) A method that creates additional lanes
on interstate highways.

HB0230

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0192
(iii) Study and explore funding strategies for
the methods considered under paragraph (ii) of this
subsection;

(iv) Not later than July 1, 2026 report to the
governor, management council and the joint transportation,
highways and military affairs interim committee on the work
of the task force, including any recommendations for
legislation for consideration by an appropriate legislative
committee.

(c) The task force shall be staffed by the
legislative service office.

(d) The legislative members of the task force shall
receive salary, per diem and travel expenses in the manner
and amount prescribed by W.S. 28-5-101. Task force members
who are state employees or government officials shall be
considered to be acting within the scope of regular
employment when conducting the official business of the
task force and shall receive their regular pay without
additional compensation, except that those members shall
receive mileage and per diem as provided for other members
HB0230

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0192
of the task force under this subsection if they are not
reimbursed by their employer. Task force members who are
not state employees shall receive per diem and mileage in
the amount provided for members of the legislature under
W.S. 28-5-101.

(e) The task force shall terminate December 31, 2026.

Section 5.

(a) There is appropriated twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000.00) from the general fund to the
legislative service office for purposes of providing
salary, mileage and per diem to the legislative members of
the task force appointed under section 1(a)(i) of this act
and for other expenses of the task force. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2027. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2027.

HB0230

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0192
(b) There is appropriated twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000.00) from the general fund to the office of
the governor for purposes of providing mileage and per diem
to the members of the task force appointed under section
1(a)(iii) of this act and for providing mileage and per
diem for members of the task force appointed under section
1(a)(ii) of this act, subject to section 1(d) of this act.
This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with
the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2027.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2027.

Section 6. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0230